New York, session 2025-2026, S1817.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 19.07 of the mental hygiene law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (o) to read as follows: 3 (o) The office of addiction services and supports shall encourage, 4 aid, and facilitate clinical research into the use of ibogaine in drug 5 treatment for heroin, methamphetamine and cocaine addiction. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03714-01-5